California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(ii) The superior court with jurisdiction over the consumer’s placement at the developmental center, including the consumer’s attorney of record and other parties known to the regional center. For judicial proceedings pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6, the comprehensive assessment shall be included in the regional center’s written report required by Section 6504.5. For all other proceedings, the regional center shall provide the comprehensive
 assessment to the court and parties to the case at least 14 days in advance of regularly scheduled judicial review. This clause shall not apply to consumers committed pursuant to Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code.

(E) The assessments described in subparagraph (D) shall be updated annually as part of the individual program planning process for as long as the consumer resides in the developmental center. To the extent appropriate, the regional center shall also provide relevant information from the statewide specialized resource service. The regional center shall notify the clients’ rights advocate for the regional center of the time, date, and location of each individual program plan meeting that includes discussion of the results of the comprehensive assessment and updates to that assessment. The regional center shall provide this notice as soon as practicable following the completion of the comprehensive assessment or update and not less than
 30 calendar days before the meeting. The clients’ rights advocate may participate in the meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf.

(d) The department shall review, negotiate, and approve regional center community placement plans for feasibility and reasonableness, including recognition of each regional centers’ current developmental center population and their corresponding placement level, as well as each regional centers’ need to develop new and innovative service models. The department shall hold regional centers accountable for the development and implementation of their approved plans. The regional centers shall report, as required by the department, on the outcomes of their plans. The department shall make aggregate performance data for each regional center available, upon request, as well as data on admissions to, and placements from, each developmental center.

(e) Funds allocated by the department to a regional center for a community placement plan developed under this section shall be controlled through the regional center contract to ensure that the funds are expended for the purposes allocated. Funds allocated for community placement plans that are not used for that purpose may be transferred to Item 4300-003-0001 for expenditure in the state developmental centers if their population exceeds the budgeted level. Any unspent funds shall revert to the General Fund.

(f) Commencing May 1, 2013, and then on April 1, 2014, and on April 1 annually thereafter, the department shall provide to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, and to the contractor for regional center clients’ rights advocacy services under Section 4433, information on efforts to serve consumers with challenging service needs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) For each regional center, the number of consumers admitted to each developmental center, including the legal basis for the admissions.

(2) For each regional center, the number of consumers described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505 who were admitted to Fairview Developmental Center by court order pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6, and the number and lengths of stay of consumers, including those who have transitioned back to a community living arrangement.

(3) Outcome data related to the assessment process set forth in Section 4418.7, including the number of consumers who received assessments pursuant to Section 4418.7 and the outcomes of the assessments. Each regional center, commencing March 1, 2013, and then on February 1, 2014, and on
 February 1 annually thereafter, shall provide the department with information on alternative community services and supports provided to those consumers who were able to remain in the community following the assessments, and the unmet service needs that resulted in any consumers being admitted to Fairview Developmental Center.

(4) Progress in the development of needed statewide specialty services and supports, including regional community crisis options, as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). Each regional center shall provide the department with a report containing the information described in this paragraph commencing March 1, 2013, and then on February 1, 2014, and on February 1 annually thereafter.

(5) Progress in reducing reliance on mental health facilities ineligible for federal Medicaid funding, and out-of-state placements, including information on the
 utilization of those facilities, which shall include, by regional center, all of the following:

(A) The total number and age range of consumers placed in those facilities.

(B) The number of admissions.

(C) The reasons for admissions by category, including, but not limited to, incompetent-to-stand-trial (IST) commitment, Section 6500 commitment, crisis stabilization, and lack of appropriate community placement.

(D) The lengths of stay of consumers.

(E) The type of facility.

(6) Information on the utilization of facilities serving consumers with challenging service needs that utilize delayed egress devices and secured
 perimeters, pursuant to Section 1267.75 or 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code, including the number of admissions, reasons for admissions, and lengths of stay of consumers, including those who have transitioned to less restrictive living arrangements.

(7) If applicable, any recommendations regarding additional rate exceptions or modifications beyond those allowed for under existing law that the department identifies as necessary to meet the needs of consumers with challenging service needs.

(g) Each regional center, commencing March 1, 2013, and then on February 1, 2014, and on February 1 annually thereafter, shall provide information to the department regarding the facilities described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f), including, but not limited to, the number of admissions, reasons for admissions, and lengths of stay of consumers, including those who have transitioned to
 less restrictive living arrangements.

(h) Each institution for mental disease that, in the preceding year, has admitted a regional center consumer, including consumers whose placements are not funded by a regional center, shall report quarterly on February 1, May 1, August 1, and November 1, to the department, the regional center providing services to the consumer, and the contractor for regional center clients’ rights advocacy services under Section 4433, all of the following in a format prescribed by the department:

(1) The total number and age, race, and ethnicity of consumers placed in that facility.

(2) The number of admissions.

(3) The reasons for admissions by category.

(4) The
 lengths of stay of consumers.

(5) The funding source.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on October 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Inoperative October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 253.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.25.

(a) The department shall establish policies and procedures for the development of an annual community resource development plan in coordination with regional centers. In accordance with Section 4679, the department’s policies and procedures shall address statewide priorities, plan requirements, the development of community resources, services, and supports for individuals transitioning from restrictive settings as described in subdivision (c), and the need for services and supports of individuals living in the community.

(b) (1) To reduce reliance on state-operated mental health facilities, including institutions for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5, for which federal
 funding is not available, and out-of-state placements, the department shall establish a statewide specialized resource service that does all of the following:

(A) Tracks the availability of specialty residential beds and services.

(B) Tracks the availability of specialty clinical services.

(C) Coordinates the need for specialty services and supports in conjunction with regional centers.

(D) Identifies, subject to federal reimbursement, services, supports, mental health services and supports, and residential options, including, but not limited to, supported living services, family home agencies, family teaching homes, and independent living services, that can be made available to individuals residing in the community, when no other community resource has
 been identified or is available.

(2) Regional centers shall provide the department with information about all specialty resources developed with the use of community resource development plan funds and shall make these resources available to other regional centers.

(c) (1) The community resource development plan shall provide for dedicated funding for comprehensive assessments of individuals transitioning from restrictive settings, including Porterville Developmental Center, Canyon Springs Community Facility, and institutions for mental disease, and for identified costs of moving individuals to the community.

(2) An assessment shall include input from the regional center, the individual, and, if appropriate, the individual’s family, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, and
 shall identify the types of community-based services, supports, mental health services and supports, and residential options, including, but not limited to, supported living services, family home agencies, family teaching homes, and independent living services, available to the individual that would enable the individual to move to a community setting.

(d) An assessment completed pursuant to the requirements of this section, including any updates, shall be provided to all of the following:

(1) The individual program planning team and clients’ rights advocate for the regional center or state-operated facility.

(2) For individuals with court commitments for placement, to the superior court with jurisdiction over the individual’s placement, including the individual’s attorney of record and other parties known to the
 regional center. For judicial proceedings pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6, the comprehensive assessment shall be included in the regional center’s written report required by Section 6504.5. For all other proceedings, the regional center shall provide the comprehensive assessment to the court and parties to the case at least 14 days in advance of regularly scheduled judicial review. This clause shall not apply to individuals committed pursuant to Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code.

(3) For individuals residing at a state-operated facility, the clients’ rights advocate for that facility as described in Sections 4433 and 4433.5.

(e) A regional center shall provide at least 30 days’ notice of any individual program plan meeting that will include discussion of an individual’s comprehensive assessment, or any updates to that
 assessment, to the clients’ rights advocates for that regional center and for any other applicable state-operated facility. Notice shall be provided as soon as practicable following the completion of the comprehensive assessment or update and include the time, date, and location of the meeting. A clients’ rights advocate may participate in the meeting unless the individual objects on their own behalf.

(f) Funding allocated to a regional center for purposes of developing a community resource development plan pursuant to this section shall be subject to Section 4679 and the regional center contract.

(g) (1) By no later than April 1 of each year, the department shall update the Legislature on the department’s efforts to serve individuals with complex service needs, following the application of deidentification guidelines for privacy protection. The update shall
 include, but not be limited to, information regarding all of the following:

(A) Progress in reducing reliance on mental health facilities ineligible for federal Medicaid funding, institutions for mental disease, and out-of-state placements, including information on the utilization of those facilities. The department shall include, by regional center, all of the following information, appropriately deidentified to protect the privacy of individuals, for these facilities:

(i) The age, race, and ethnicity of individuals placed in the facilities described in subparagraph (A) and the total number of placements.

(ii) The total number of admissions.

(iii) The reasons for admission by category, including, but not limited to, incompetent-to-stand-trial
 commitments, commitments made pursuant to Section 6500, crisis stabilization, and the lack of appropriate community placement.

(iv) The lengths of stay of individuals.

(v) The types of facilities.

(vi) The funding source for the placements.

(B) Information on the utilization of facilities serving individuals with complex service needs that utilize delayed egress devices and secured perimeters pursuant to Section 1267.75 or 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code, including the number of admissions, reasons for admission, and the lengths of stay of individuals, including those individuals who have transitioned to less restrictive living arrangements during the prior year.

(2) The department
 shall publish the update on its internet website.

(h) This section, or any changes made to this section after October 1, 2026, shall not be deemed to alter or waive any department or regional center agreement, promissory note, deed of trust, letter, approval or other documents that concern community placement plan programs or community resource development plan programs or related funding that were or are in effect or pending as of October 1, 2026.

(i) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 2.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the transition process from a developmental center to a community living arrangement is based upon the individual’s needs, developed through the individual program plan process, and ensures that needed services and supports will be in place at the time the individual moves. It is further the intent of the Legislature that regional centers, developmental centers, and regional resource development projects coordinate with each other for the benefit of their activities in assessment, in the development of individual program plans, and in planning, transition, and deflection, and for the benefit of consumers.

(b) As individuals are identified for possible movement to the community, an individual planning meeting shall be initiated by the developmental center, which shall notify the planning team, pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 4512, and the regional resource development project of the meeting. The regional resource development project shall make services available to the developmental center and the regional center, including, but not limited to, consultations with the planning teams and the identification of services and supports necessary for the consumer to succeed in community living.

(c) The development of the individual program plan shall be consistent with Sections 4646 and 4646.5. For the purpose of this section, the planning team shall include developmental center staff knowledgeable about the service and support needs of the consumer.

(d) Regional resource development project services may include providing information in an understandable form to consumers and, where appropriate, their families, conservators, legal guardians, or authorized representatives, that will assist them in making decisions about community living and services and supports. This information may include affording the consumer the opportunity to visit a variety of community living arrangements that could meet his or her needs. If the visits are not feasible, as determined by the planning team, a family member or other representative of the consumer may conduct the visits. Regional resource development projects may be requested to facilitate these visits. The availability of this service shall be made known by the planning team to consumers and, where appropriate, their families, conservators, legal guardians, or authorized representative.

(e) Once the individual program plan is completed and providers of services and supports are identified and agreed to, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4646.5, and no less than 15 days prior to the move, unless otherwise ordered by a court, a transition conference, which may be facilitated by a regional resource development project, shall be held. Participants in the transition conference shall include, but not be limited to, the consumer, where appropriate the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, a regional center representative, a developmental center representative, and a representative of each provider of primary services and supports identified in the individual program plan. This meeting may take place in the catchment area to which the consumer is moving. If necessary, conferees may participate by telephone or video conference. The purpose of this conference shall be to ensure a smooth transition from the developmental center to the community.

(f) The department, through the appropriate regional resource development project, shall provide, in cooperation with regional centers and developmental centers, followup services to help ensure a smooth transition to the community. Followup services shall include, but shall not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Regularly scheduled as well as on an as-needed basis, contacts and visits with consumers and service providers during the 12 months following the consumers movement date.

(2) Participation in the development of an individual program plan in accordance with Sections 4646 and 4646.5.

(3) Identification of issues that need resolution.

(4) Arrangement for the provision of developmental center services, including, but not limited to, medication review, crisis services, and behavioral consultation.

(g) To ascertain that the individual program plan is being implemented, that planned services are being provided, and that the consumer and, where appropriate the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, or conservator, are satisfied with the community living arrangement, the regional center shall schedule face-to-face reviews no less than once every 30 days for the first 90 days. Following the first 90 days, and following notification to the department, the regional center may conduct these reviews less often as specified in the individual program plan.

(h) The regional center and the regional resource development project shall coordinate their followup reviews required pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) and shall share with each other information obtained during the course of the followup visits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 29.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.5.

The department may provide protective social services for the care of developmentally disabled patients released from state hospitals of the department or to prevent the unnecessary admission of developmentally disabled persons to hospitals at public expense or to facilitate the release of developmentally disabled patients for whom such hospital care is no longer the appropriate treatment; provided that such services may be rendered only if provision for such services is made in the California Developmental Disabilities State Plan.

The department, to the extent funds are appropriated and available, shall pay for the cost of providing for care in a private home for developmentally disabled persons described in, and subject to the request and plan conditions of, the immediately preceding paragraph. The monthly rate for such private home care shall be set by the department at an amount which will provide the best possible care at minimum cost and also insure:

(1) That the person will receive proper treatment and may be expected to show progress in achieving the maximum adjustment toward returning to community life; and

(2) That sufficient homes can be recruited to achieve the stated objectives of this section.

It is the legislative intent that the department may make the fullest possible use of available resources in serving developmentally disabled persons.

The department may provide services pursuant to this section directly or through contract with public or private entities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any contract or grant entered into with a public or private nonprofit corporation for the provision of services to developmentally disabled persons may provide for periodic advance payments for services to be performed under such contract. No advanced payment made pursuant to this section shall exceed 25 percent of the total annual contract amount.

The department may provide protective social services, including the cost of care in a private home pursuant to this section or in a suitable facility as specified in Section 7354, for judicially committed developmentally disabled patients released from a state hospital on leave of absence or parole, and payments therefor shall be made from funds available to the department for that purpose or for the support of patients in state hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.6.

The department may establish within its family care program respite care services for the developmentally disabled. Such respite care services may be available to both family home caretakers and to persons referred by the regional centers for the developmentally disabled. For purposes of this section, respite care means temporary and intermittent care provided for short periods of time.

The rate of reimbursement for such respite care service shall be established by the department after it conducts a study to determine if there are increased costs inherent in the provision of an intermittent and irregular service.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10053.9 by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.7.

(a) (1) If the regional center determines, or is informed by the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative that the community placement of a consumer is at risk of failing, and that admittance to an acute crisis home operated by the department is a likelihood, or the regional center is notified by a court of a potential admission to an acute crisis home operated by the department, the regional center shall immediately notify the appropriate regional resource development project, the consumer, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, or conservator, and the regional center clients’ rights advocate. For purposes of this section, “acute crisis home operated by the department” means property
 used to provide Stabilization, Training, Assistance and Reintegration (STAR) services.

(2) For purposes of this section, notification to the clients’ rights advocate for the consumer’s regional center shall include a copy of the most recent comprehensive assessment or updated assessment, and the time, date, and location of an individual program plan meeting held pursuant to subdivision (b). The regional center shall provide this notice as soon as practicable, but not less than seven calendar days prior to the meeting.

(b) In these cases, the regional resource development project shall immediately arrange for an assessment of the situation, including, visiting the consumer, if appropriate, determining barriers to successful integration, and recommending the most appropriate means
 necessary to assist the consumer to remain in the community. The regional center shall request assistance from the statewide specialized resource service pursuant to Section
 4418.25, as necessary, in order to determine the most appropriate means necessary to assist the consumer to remain in the community and shall provide the information obtained from the statewide specialized resource service to the regional resource development project. If, based on the assessment, the regional resource development project determines that additional or different services and supports are necessary, the department shall ensure that the regional center provides those services and supports on an emergency basis. An individual program plan meeting, including the regional resource development project’s representative, if necessary shall be convened as soon as possible to review the emergency services and supports and determine the consumer’s ongoing needs for services and supports. The regional resource development project shall follow up with the regional center as to the
 success of the recommended interventions until the consumer’s living arrangement is stable.

(c) (1) If the regional resource development project determines, based on the assessment conducted pursuant to subdivision (b), that the consumer referred to the regional resource development project by the court cannot be safely served in an acute crisis home operated by the department, the department shall notify the court in writing and shall continue to work jointly with the regional center to identify or develop alternative services and supports and implement the alternative services and supports that are identified or developed.

(2) (A) If the regional resource development project, in consultation with the regional center, the consumer, and the consumer’s
 parents, legal guardian, or conservator, when appropriate, determines that admittance to an acute crisis home operated by the department is necessary due to an acute crisis, as
 defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and the director of the department or their designee has approved admission, the regional center shall immediately pursue the obtainment of a court order pursuant to Section 6506 for short-term admission and crisis stabilization.

(B) (i) The regional resource development project, in consultation with the regional center, the consumer, and, when appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, shall not make a determination that admittance to an acute crisis home operated by the department is necessary due to an acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), unless the determination includes a regional center report detailing all considered community-based services and supports, including, but not
 limited to, a community crisis home certified pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4698) of Chapter 6 of Division 4.5, a supported living arrangement pursuant to Section 4689, including rental subsidies described in subdivision (i) of Section 4689, environmental accessibility adaptions or other home modifications, supplemental services and emergency and crisis intervention services described in subdivision (a) of Section 4648, whether rate adjustments are necessary to secure the services and supports considered, and an explanation of why those options could not meet the consumer’s needs at the time of the determination.

(ii) For purposes of complying with clause (i), the regional center shall not be required to consider out-of-state placements or mental health facilities, including institutions for mental disease, as
 described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5, that are ineligible for federal Medicaid funding.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Acute crisis” means, as a result of the consumer’s behavior, all of the following are met:

(i) There is imminent risk for substantial harm to the consumer or others.

(ii) The service and support needs of the consumer cannot be met in the community, including with supplemental services, as set forth in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, and emergency and crisis intervention services, as set forth in
 paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648.

(iii) Due to serious and potentially life-threatening conditions, the consumer requires a specialized environment for crisis stabilization.

(B) “Containment” has the same meaning as defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(C) “Emergency intervention” has the same meaning as defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(D) “Physical restraint” has the same meaning as defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(E) “Prone restraint” has the same meaning as defined
 in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(F) “Seclusion” has the same meaning as defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), out-of-state placements or mental health facilities and other facilities, including institutions for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5, for which federal Medicaid funding is not available, shall not be deemed to be supplemental services or emergency and crisis intervention services.

(e) When an admission occurs due to an acute crisis, all of the following shall apply:

(1) As soon as possible
 following admission to an acute crisis home operated by the department, a comprehensive assessment shall be completed by the regional center in coordination with the regional resource development project and the acute crisis service staff. The comprehensive assessment shall include the identification of the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and the timeline for identifying or developing the services and supports needed to transition the consumer back to a noncrisis community setting. The regional center shall immediately submit a copy of the comprehensive assessment to the committing court. Immediately following the assessment, and not later than 30 days following admission, the regional center and the acute crisis home operated by the department shall jointly convene an individual program plan meeting to determine the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and to
 develop a plan to transition the consumer into community living pursuant to Section 4418.3. The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the admission and the individual program plan meeting and may participate in the individual program plan meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf.

(2) If transition is not expected within 90 days of admission, an individual program plan meeting shall be held to discuss the status of transition and to determine if the consumer is still in need of crisis stabilization. If crisis services continue to be necessary, the regional center shall submit to the department an updated transition plan and a request for an extension of stay at the acute crisis home operated by the department of up to 90 days.

(3) (A) A consumer shall reside in an acute crisis home operated by the department no longer than six months before being placed into a community living arrangement pursuant to Section 4418.3, unless, prior to the end of the six months, all of the following have occurred:

(i) The regional center has conducted an additional comprehensive assessment based on information provided by the regional center, and the department determines that the consumer continues to be in an acute crisis.

(ii) The individual program planning team has developed a plan that identifies the specific services and supports necessary to transition the consumer into the community, and the plan includes a timeline to obtain or develop those services and supports.

(iii) The committing court has reviewed and, if appropriate, extended the commitment.

(B) The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the proposed extension pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) and the individual program plan meeting to consider the extension, and may participate in the individual program plan meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf.

(C) (i) A consumer’s placement at an acute crisis home operated by the department shall not exceed one year unless both of the following occur:

(I) The regional center demonstrates significant progress toward implementing the plan
 specified in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) identifying the specific services and supports necessary to transition the consumer into the community.

(II) Extraordinary circumstances exist beyond the regional center’s control that have prevented the regional center from obtaining those services and supports within the timeline based on the plan.

(ii) If both of the circumstances described in subclauses (I) and (II) of clause (i) exist, the regional center may request, and the committing court may grant, an additional extension of the commitment, not to exceed 30 days.

(D) Consumers placed in the community after admission to an acute crisis home operated by the department pursuant to this section shall be considered
 to have moved from a developmental center for purposes of Section 4640.6.

(f) The department shall collect data on the outcomes of efforts to assist at-risk consumers to remain in the community. The department shall make aggregate data on the implementation of the requirements of this section available, upon request.

(g) Commencing January 1, 2015, admissions to an acute crisis home operated by the department pursuant to a court order for an acute crisis, as described in this section, shall be limited to a property used to provide STAR services.

(h) Acute crisis consumers may participate in day, work, education, and recreational programs when the individual program plan identifies it is appropriate and consistent with
 the individual’s treatment plan. The acute crisis homes shall assist the consumer with transitioning back to their prior residence, or an alternative community-based residential setting, within the timeframe described in this section.

(i) The department may execute leases, lease-purchases, or leases with the option to purchase for real property necessary for the establishment or maintenance of STAR homes to serve as acute crisis homes operated by the department.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, an acute crisis home operated by the department shall not utilize any of the following interventions:

(1) A prone restraint.

(2) A physical
 restraint or containment, unless the consumer presents an imminent risk of serious physical harm to themselves or others that cannot be prevented using a less restrictive technique. In no circumstance shall an acute crisis home operated by the department utilize an emergency intervention technique that obstructs a consumer’s respiratory airway or impairs the consumer’s breathing or respiratory capacity.

(3) Seclusion.

(4) The emergency interventions described in Section 85102 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) Psychotropic or behavior-modifying medications used to control behavior or to restrict a person’s freedom of movement if that medication is not a standard treatment for the person’s individualized
 medical or psychiatric condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 129.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.8.

(a) (1) As part of the safety net plan required by Section 4474.16, the department may develop a residential program in the community for adolescents and adults with complex needs. This program shall consist of up to three complex needs homes described in this section. A complex needs home shall not exceed five beds per home and any stay shall not exceed 18 months, except as provided by paragraph (5) of subdivision (e).

(2) If the regional center determines, or is informed by the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, that the community placement of a consumer is at risk of failing and that admittance to a complex needs
 residential home is a likelihood, or the regional center is notified by a court of a potential admission to a complex needs home, the regional center shall immediately notify the appropriate regional resource development project, the consumer, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, or conservator, and the regional center clients’ rights advocate.

(3) For purposes of this section, notification to the clients’ rights advocate for the consumer’s regional center shall include a copy of the most recent comprehensive assessment or updated assessment and the time, date, and location of the individual program plan meeting to be held pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). The regional center shall provide this notice as soon as practicable, but no later than seven calendar days prior to the meeting.

(b) (1) Upon notification by the regional center, the regional resource development project shall immediately conduct an assessment of the situation that includes all of the following:

(A) Visiting the consumer, if appropriate.

(B) Determining barriers to successful community inclusion.

(C) Providing recommendations on the most appropriate means necessary to assist the consumer to reside in the most inclusive living arrangement.

(2) The regional center shall immediately request assistance from the statewide specialized resource service established pursuant to Section 4418.25 in order
 to determine the most appropriate means necessary to assist the consumer to reside in the most inclusive living arrangement and shall provide the information obtained from the statewide specialized resource service to the regional resource development project. If, based on the assessment required by paragraph (1), the regional resource development project determines that additional or different services and supports are necessary, the regional center shall provide those services and supports on an emergency basis.

(3) An individual program plan meeting, including the regional resource development project’s representative, if necessary, shall be convened as soon as possible to review the emergency services and supports required by the consumer and to determine the consumer’s ongoing needs for services and supports. The regional resource
 development project shall follow up with the regional center as to the success of the recommended interventions until the consumer’s living arrangement is stable.
